District of Columbia statutes.
28-4905

Construction and application.

This chapter must be construed and applied:

(1)

To facilitate electronic transactions consistent with other applicable law;

(2)

To be consistent with reasonable practices concerning electronic transactions and with the continued expansion of those practices; and

(3)

To effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law with respect to the subject of this chapter among states enacting it.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 3502(b), 48 DCR 6981
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105, § 64, 51 DCR 881
D.C. Law 15-105 validated previously made technical corrections.
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3202(b) of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 6 of the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act (1999 Act).